Utah statutes.
62A-11-320.   Payment schedules.
(1)  The office may:
(a)  set or reset a level and schedule of payments at any time consistent with
the income, earning capacity, and resources of the obligor; or
(b)  demand payment in full.
(2)  If a support debt is reduced to a schedule of payments and made subject
to income withholding, the total monthly amount of the scheduled payment,
current support payment, and cost of health insurance attributable to a child
for whom the obligor has been ordered may only be subject to income
withholding in an amount that does not exceed the maximum amount permitted
under Section 303(b) of the Consumer Credit Protection Act, 15 U.S.C.  Sec.
1673(b).
(3) (a)  Within 15 days of receiving notice, an obligor may contest a payment
schedule as inconsistent with Subsection (2) or the rules adopted by the
office to establish payment schedules under Subsection (1) by filing a written
request for an adjudicative proceeding.
(b)  For purposes of Subsection (3)(a), notice includes:
(i)  notice sent to the obligor by the office in accordance with Section
62A-11-304.4;
(ii)  participation by the obligor in the proceedings related to the
establishment of the payment schedule; and
(iii)  receiving a paycheck in which a reduction has been made in accordance
with a payment schedule established under Subsection (1).
